Wyoming statutes. Title 12 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 3 Taxation

§ 12-3-101.
Excise tax to be paid; limitation on liquor or malt beverage importation; penalties.

An excise tax is assessed and shall be collected by the division equal to three-fourths of one cent ($.0075) per one hundred (100) milliliters (3.4 ounces) or fraction thereof on wine, two and one-half cents ($.025) per one hundred (100) milliliters (3.4 ounces) or fraction thereof on spirituous liquors and one-half cent ($.005) per liter (33.8 ounces) or fraction thereof on malt beverages. The appropriate excise tax shall be collected on all alcoholic or malt beverages sold, offered for sale or use in this state.

It is unlawful for any licensee to receive or possess any alcoholic or malt beverage upon which state excise taxes have not been paid.

Any licensee or permittee who violates subsection (b) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00), imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, or both.

No person shall, without authorization from the division or by law, personally transport alcoholic liquor or malt beverages into Wyoming for sale, use or consumption in the state when the applicable state excise tax has not been paid. No person shall import or transport at any given time more than three (3) liters of alcoholic liquor excluding wine, nine (9) liters of wine or five (5) gallons of malt beverage for the personal use of the possessor into Wyoming if the applicable state taxes have not been paid. This subsection shall not apply to a person importing manufactured wine in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

12-2-204

.

Any person importing or transporting alcoholic liquor in violation of subsection (d) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor. All alcoholic liquor or malt beverages illegally imported or transported shall be forfeited and delivered to the division for disposition as inventory stock.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 30; 1945, ch. 133, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 53-230; W.S. 1957, § 12-5(a), (b); Laws 1963, ch. 194, § 3; 1971, ch. 120, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 12-1-105; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1979, ch. 156, § 2; 1985, ch. 92, § 2; 2001, ch. 84, § 2; 2011, ch. 129, § 206; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

Cross references. —

As to collection of excise tax by liquor commission, see §

12-2-302

.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), substituted “wine” for “fermented liquors.”

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “division” for “commission” in (a), (d) and (e).

Unconstitutional amendment. —

Laws 1963, ch. 194, § 3 amended this section by increasing the tax on malt liquors in subsection (a) from two cents to six cents per gallon and adding two subsections. The same 1963 act added provisions for liquor purchase identification cards. The 1963 act was held unconstitutional and void in toto as violating art. 3, § 24, Wyo. Const., on the ground that: (1) the increase in the tax on malt liquors was not expressed in the title; and (2) the act contained two subjects and it was impossible for the court to choose between the two objectives and hold the act valid as to one and void as to the other. Smith v. Hansen, 386 P.2d 98,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1963).

§ 12-3-102.
Confiscation authorized; disposition; when seizure permitted.

When an authorized inspector discovers alcoholic liquors or malt beverages upon which excise taxes have not been paid in the possession of a licensee, he shall take possession of and hold the alcoholic liquors or malt beverages as evidence against the offender. If the offender is convicted of a violation of W.S.

12-3-101

, the court shall order that the untaxed liquor or beverage be delivered to the division, if merchantable, where it will be added to its stock and sold in the usual course of business. If the liquors or beverages are determined to be nonmerchantable, the court shall order their destruction. This subsection shall not apply to homemade beverages that are provided in accordance with an event under W.S.

12-10-102

, provided that the beverages shall be removed from the premises within twenty-four (24) hours following the end of the event.

Whenever an inspector, agent or employee of the division or any peace officer of the state lawfully discovers alcoholic liquors or malt beverages which have been unlawfully imported or transported, he may seize the alcoholic liquor or malt beverage and packages in which they are contained for use as evidence and shall not be removed from state control upon writ of replevin or other like process. Nothing in this section shall apply to the transportation of homemade beverages to or from an event held pursuant to W.S.

12-10-102

.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 30; 1945, ch. 133, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 53-230; W.S. 1957, § 12-5(b), (d); Laws 1963, ch. 194, § 3; W.S. 1977, § 12-1-105; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2016 ch. 86, § 2, effective March 4, 2016.

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, by
ch. 51 § 1, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “division” for “commission” throughout the section.

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 86 § 2, added the last sentence in (a) and the last sentence in (b).

Laws 2016, ch. 86, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8, Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 4, 2016.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Cited

in

Hansen v. Smith, 395 P.2d 944,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1964).